California statutes. Public Resources Code
(d) (1) Civil penalties collected pursuant to this section shall be paid to the office of the city attorney, county counsel, city prosecutor, district attorney, or Attorney General, whichever office brought the action.

(2) Moneys collected by the Attorney General pursuant to this subdivision shall be deposited into the Unfair Competition Law Fund established pursuant to Section 17206 of the Business and Professions Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 590, Sec. 2.   (AB 818)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

49654.

(a) The provisions of this part are severable. If any provision of this part or its application is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.

(b) The Legislature finds and declares that this part addresses a matter of statewide concern rather than a municipal affair as that term is used in Section 5 of Article XI of the California Constitution. Therefore, this part applies to all cities, including charter cities. This part supersedes and preempts all rules, regulations, codes, ordinances, and other laws adopted by a city, county, city and county, municipality, or local
 agency regarding the labeling of covered products.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 590, Sec. 2.   (AB 818)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 31. WASTE MANAGEMENT FACILITIES [50000. - 50002.]

50000.

(a) Until an integrated waste management plan has been approved by the California Integrated Waste Management Board pursuant to Division 30 (commencing with Section 40000), no person shall establish a new solid waste facility or transformation facility or expand an existing solid waste facility or transformation facility that will result in a significant increase in the amount of solid waste handled at the facility without a certification by the enforcement agency that one of the following has occurred:

(1) The facility is identified and described in, or found to conform with, a county solid waste management plan that was in compliance with statutes and regulations in existence on December 31, 1989, adopted pursuant to former Title 7.3 (commencing with Section 66700) of the Government Code as that former statute read on December 31, 1989. The conformance finding with that plan shall be in accordance with the procedure for a finding of conformance that was set forth in the plan prior to January 1, 1990.

(2) The facility is identified and described in the most recent county solid waste management plan that has been approved by the county and by a majority of the cities within the county that contain a majority of the population of the incorporated area of the county, except in those counties that have only two cities, in which case, the plan has been approved by the county and by the city that contains a majority of the population of the incorporated area of the county.

(3) Pursuant to the procedures in subdivision (b), the facility has been approved by the county and by a majority of the cities within the county that contain a majority of the population of the incorporated area of the county, except in those counties that have only two cities, in which case, the facility has been approved by the county and by the city that contains a majority of the population of the incorporated area of the county.

(4) The facility is a material recovery facility and the site identification and description of the facility have been submitted to the task force created pursuant to Section 40950 for review and comment, pursuant to the procedures set forth in subdivision (c). For purposes of this paragraph, “material recovery facility” means a transfer station that is designed to, and, as a condition of its permit, shall, recover for reuse or recycling at least 15 percent of the total volume of material received by the facility.

(5) The facility is identified and described in the countywide siting element that has been approved pursuant to Section 41721.

(b) (1) The review and approval of a solid waste facility or transformation facility that has not been identified or described in a county solid waste management plan shall be initiated by submittal by the person or agency proposing the facility of a site identification and description to the county board of supervisors.

(2) The county shall submit the site identification and description to each city within the county within 20 days from the date that the site identification and description is submitted to the county board of supervisors. The county and each city shall approve or disapprove by resolution the site identification and description within 90 days from the date that the site identification and description are initially submitted to the county or city. Each city shall notify the county board of supervisors of its decision within that 90-day period. If the county or a city fails to approve or disapprove the site identification and description within 90 days, the city or county shall be deemed to have approved the site identification and description as submitted.

(3) If a city or county disapproves the site identification and description, the city or county shall mail notice of its decision by first-class mail to the person or agency requesting the approval within 10 days of the disapproval by the city or county, stating its reasons for the disapproval.

(4) No county or city shall disapprove a proposed site identification and description for a new solid waste facility or transformation facility or an expanded solid waste facility or transformation facility that will result in a significant increase in the amount of solid waste handled at the facility unless it determines, based upon substantial evidence in the record, that there will be one or more significant adverse impacts within its boundaries from the proposed project.

(5) Within 45 days from the date of a decision by a city or county to disapprove a site identification and description, or a decision by the board not to concur in the issuance of a permit pursuant to Section 44009, any person may file with the superior court a writ of mandate for review of the decision. The evidence before the court shall consist of the record before the city or county that disapproved the site identification and description or the record before the board in its determination not to concur in issuance of the permit. Section 1094.5 of the Code of Civil Procedure shall govern the proceedings conducted pursuant to this subdivision.

(c) To initiate the review and comment by the task force required by paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) and subdivision (d), the person or agency proposing the facility shall submit the site identification and description of the facility to the task force. Within 90 days after the site identification and description are submitted to the task force, the task force shall meet and comment on the facility in writing. Those comments shall include, but are not limited to, the relationship between the proposed new or expanded material recovery facility and the requirements of Section 41780. The task force shall transmit those comments to the applicant, to the county, and to all of the cities in the county.

(d) On or before February 1, 1991, each county, by vote of the board of supervisors and the majority of the cities in the county containing a majority of the population of the incorporated area of the county, except in those counties that have only two cities, in which case the vote is subject to approval of the city that contains a majority of the population of the incorporated area of the county, shall adopt two resolutions after holding a public hearing. One resolution shall address solid waste transfer facilities that are designed to, and, as a condition of their permits, shall, recover for reuse or recycling less than 15 percent of the total volume of material received by the facility and that serve more than one jurisdiction. The second resolution shall address solid waste transfer facilities that are designed to, and, as a condition of their permits, shall, recover for reuse or recycling less than 15 percent of the total volume of material received by the facility and that serve only one jurisdiction. These resolutions shall specify whether the facilities shall be subject to the review and approval process described in subdivision (b) or the review and comment process described in subdivision (c). If the resolutions required by this subdivision are not adopted on or before February 1, 1991, those facilities shall be subject to the review process described in subdivision (c).

For purposes of this subdivision, a facility serves only one jurisdiction if it serves only one city, only the unincorporated area of one county, or only one city and county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 183, Sec. 307.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

50000.5.

(a) Until a countywide integrated waste management plan has been approved by the California Integrated Waste Management Board pursuant to Division 30 (commencing with Section 40000), no person shall establish or expand a solid waste facility or transformation facility unless the city or county in which the site is located makes a finding that the establishment or expansion of the facility is consistent with the applicable general plan of the city or county. This finding shall not be made unless the city or county has adopted a general plan which complies with the provisions of Article 5 (commencing with Section 65300) of Chapter 3 of Division 1 of Title 7 of the Government Code.

(b) In addition to the requirements in subdivision (a), any new or expanded solid waste disposal facility or transformation facility shall be deemed to be consistent with the general plan only if both of the following requirements are met:

(1) The facility is located in a land use area designated or authorized for solid waste facilities in the applicable city or county general plan.

(2) The land uses which are authorized adjacent to, or near, the facility are compatible with the establishment, or expansion of, the solid waste disposal facility or transformation facility.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1617, Sec. 5.   Effective September 30, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

50001.

(a) Except as provided by subdivision (b), after a countywide or regional agency integrated waste management plan has been approved by the Department of Resources Recycling and Recovery pursuant to Division 30 (commencing with Section 40000), a person shall not establish or expand a solid waste facility, as defined in Section 40194, in the county unless the solid waste facility meets one of the following criteria:

(1) The solid waste facility is a disposal facility, a transformation facility, or an EMSW conversion facility, the location of which is identified in the countywide siting element or amendment to that element, which has been approved pursuant to Section 41721.

(2) The solid waste facility is a facility that is designed to recover for reuse or recycling at least 5 percent of the total volume of material received by the facility, and that is identified in the nondisposal facility element that has been approved pursuant to Section 41800 or is included in an update to that element.

(b) Solid waste facilities other than those specified in paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (a) shall not be required to comply with the requirements of this section.

(c) The person or agency proposing to establish a solid waste facility shall prepare and submit a site identification and description of the proposed facility to the task force established pursuant to Section 40950. Within 90 days after the
 site identification and description is submitted to the task force, the task force shall meet and comment on the proposed solid waste facility in writing. These comments shall include, but are not limited to, the relationship between the proposed solid waste facility and the implementation schedule requirements of Section 41780 and the regional impact of the facility. The task force shall transmit these comments to the person or public agency proposing establishment of the solid waste facility, to the county, and to all cities within the county. The comments shall become part of the official record of the proposed solid waste facility.

(d) The review and comment by the local task force shall not be required for an update to a nondisposal facility element.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 411, Sec. 12.   (AB 1126)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

50001.2.

Nothing in this division is intended to limit the ability of a city or county to enter into a joint exercise of powers agreement to establish procedures, plans, policies, and criteria to which solid waste facilities shall conform.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1291, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

50001.5.

At the request of the board or any local governmental entity, the Attorney General shall bring an action to enforce this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1291, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

50002.

(a) The California Integrated Waste Management Board may, by regulation, specify classifications of solid waste facilities that are exempt from the requirements of Sections 50000, 50000.5, and 50001. The regulation may be adopted only if the board makes all of the following findings:

(1) The exemption is not contrary to the public interest.

(2) The quantity of solid wastes to be disposed of at each site is insignificant.

(3) The nature of the solid wastes poses no significant threat to the public health, the public safety, or the environment.

(b) The application to land of agricultural products derived from municipal sewage sludge for use as a fertilizer material, based on a finding by the board that the nature of the solid waste poses no significant threat to the public health, the public safety, or the environment, is exempt from the requirements of Sections 50000 and 50000.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1617, Sec. 6.   Effective September 30, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 33. GLASS CONTAMINATION [70000. - 70031.]



CHAPTER 1. The Clean Glass Recycling Act of 1990 [70000. - 70031.]



  ARTICLE 1. Title and Definitions [70000. - 70001.]

70000.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the Clean Glass Recycling Act of 1990.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 879, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

70001.

“Beverage or food container” means packaging of finished products which contain food or drink items for retail sale.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 879, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Ceramic Glass Use [70020. - 70020.]

70020.

On or after January 1, 1991, it is unlawful to sell, manufacture, or distribute glass beverage or glass food containers which, as part of the product, bear or are attached to ceramic materials. This section does not apply to ceramic enamels used for decorating or labeling glass beverage containers or other glass containers, or to special edition or holiday season distilled spirit containers which are not intended for disposal and are intended to be retained as collectors’ items.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 879, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Penalties [70030. - 70031.]

70030.

In addition to other applicable civil or criminal penalties, any person convicted of a violation of this chapter is guilty of an infraction, which is punishable by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) per day that the violation continues. Each day of violation is a separate offense.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 879, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

70031.

(a) Any person who violates this chapter is subject to a civil penalty of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) per day for each day that the violation continues.

(b) The city attorney or district attorney in whose jurisdiction the violation occurs, or the Attorney General, may petition the superior court to impose, assess, and recover the civil penalties provided in this section.

(c) The penalties under this section are in addition to any other applicable civil or criminal penalties.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 879, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 34. ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION [71000. - 71465.]



PART 1. PERMITS [71000. - 71031.]



  CHAPTER 1. Legislative Findings and Intent [71000. - 71001.]

71000.

This part shall be known, and may be cited, as the Environmental Protection Permit Reform Act of 1993.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 962, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

71001.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares all of the following:

(a) California’s environmental protection programs have established strict standards to reduce pollution and protect the public health and safety and the environment. The single purpose programs instituted to achieve these standards have been among the most successful efforts in the world, and have produced significant gains in protecting California’s environment in the face of substantial population growth.

(b) Continued progress to achieve the environmental standards in face of continued population growth will require greater coordination between the single purpose environmental programs and more efficient operation of these programs overall. Pollution must be prevented and controlled and not simply transferred to another media or another place. This goal can only be achieved by maintaining the current environmental protection standards and by greater integration of the existing programs.

(c) As the number of environmental laws and regulations have grown in California, so have the number of permits required of business and government. This regulatory burden has significantly added to the cost and time needed to obtain essential operating permits in California. The increasing number of individual permits and permit authorities has generated the continuing potential for conflict, overlap, and duplication between the various state, local, and federal environmental permits.

(d) To ensure that local needs and environmental conditions receive the proper attention, the issuance of environmental permits should continue to be made, to the extent feasible, at the regional and local levels of the environmental programs. To establish the framework for coordination among the regional offices of the environmental protection programs, consistency in regional boundaries should be achieved to the maximum extent practicable.

(e) The purpose of this division is to require the Secretary for Environmental Protection to institute new, efficient procedures which will assist businesses and public agencies in complying with the environmental quality laws in an expedited fashion, without reducing protection of public health and safety and the environment.

(f) Those procedures need to provide a permit process that promotes effective dialogue and ensures ease in the transfer and clarification of technical information, while preventing duplication. It is necessary that the procedures establish a process for preliminary and ongoing meetings between the applicant, the consolidated permit agency, and the participating permit agencies, but do not preclude the applicant or participating permit agencies from individually coordinating with each other.

(g) It is necessary, to the maximum extent practicable, that the procedures established in this division ensure that the consolidated permit agency process and applicable permit requirements and criteria are integrated and run concurrently, rather than consecutively.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 419, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Definitions [71010. - 71017.]

71010.

“Secretary” means the Secretary for Environmental Protection.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 419, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

71011.

“Environmental agency” means any of the following:

(a) The Department of Toxic Substances Control, the Department of Pesticide Regulation, the State Air Resources Board, the State Water Resources Control Board, the California Integrated Waste Management Board, and the Office of Environmental Health Hazard Assessment.

(b) A California regional water quality control board.

(c) A district, as defined in Section 39025 of the Health and Safety Code.

(d) An enforcement agency, as defined in Section 40130 of the Public Resources Code.

(e) A county agricultural commissioner with respect to his or her administration of Divisions 6 (commencing with Section 11401) and 7 (commencing with Section 12501) of the Food and Agricultural Code.

(f) The local agency responsible for administering Chapter 6.7 (commencing with Section 25280) of the Health and Safety Code concerning underground storage tanks and any underground storage tank ordinance adopted by a city or county.

(g) The local agency responsible for the administration of the requirements imposed pursuant to Section 13370.5 of the Water Code.

(h) A certified unified program agency as provided in Chapter 6.11 (commencing with Section 25404) of Division 20 of the Health and Safety Code.

(i) Any other state, regional, or local permit agency for the project that participates at the request of the permit applicant upon the permit agency’s agreement to be subject to this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 367, Sec. 1.   Effective August 19, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

71012.

“Environmental permit” means any license, certificate, registration, permit, or other form of authorization required by an environmental agency to engage in a particular activity. “Environmental permit” includes, but is not limited to, activities subject to Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 65920) of Division 1 of Title 7 of the Government Code, if the activities are under the jurisdiction of an environmental agency. “Environmental permit” does not include any certification or decision pursuant to Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000).

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 419, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

71013.

“Project” means an activity, the conduct of which requires an environmental permit from two or more environmental agencies.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 419, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

71014.

“Consolidated permit” means a permit incorporating the environmental permits granted by environmental agencies for a project and issued in a single permit document by the consolidated permit agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 419, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

71015.

“Consolidated permit agency” means the environmental agency that has the greatest overall jurisdiction over a project, as determined pursuant to Section 71020.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 419, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

71016.

“Participating permit agency” means an environmental agency, other than the consolidated permit agency, that is responsible for the issuance of an environmental permit for a project.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 419, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

71017.

(a) “Council” means the California Environmental Policy Council.

(b) The council is hereby created and consists of the following members or their designees:

(1) The Secretary for Environmental Protection.

(2) The Director of Pesticide Regulation.

(3) The Director of Toxic Substances Control.

(4) The Chairperson of the State Air Resources Board.

(5) The Chairperson of the State Water Resources Control Board.

(6) The Director of the Office of Environmental Health Hazard Assessment.

(7) The Chairperson of the California Integrated Waste Management Board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 419, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Consolidated Permits [71020. - 71029.]

71020.

(a) On or before January 1, 1995, the secretary shall establish an administrative process which may be used, at the request of a permit applicant for a project pursuant to Section 71021, for the designation of a consolidated permit agency for the project.

(b) That administrative process shall consist of the establishment of guidelines for designating the consolidated permit agency for the project. The guidelines shall be adopted as regulations pursuant to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. In those cases where an environmental agency is the lead agency for purposes of Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 65920) of Division 1 of Title 7 of the Government Code, or Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000), that environmental agency shall be the consolidated permit agency. In other cases, the guidelines shall require that at least the following factors be considered in determining which environmental agency has the greatest overall jurisdiction over the project:

(1) The types of facilities or activities that make up the project.

(2) The types of public health and safety and environmental concerns that should be considered in issuing environmental permits for the project.

(3) The environmental medium that may be affected by the project, the extent of those potential effects, and the environmental protection measures that may be taken to prevent the occurrence of, or to mitigate, those potential effects.

(4) The regulatory activity that is of greatest importance in preventing or mitigating the effects that the project may have on public health and safety or the environment.

(5) The statutory and regulatory requirements that apply to the project and the complexity of those requirements.

(c) The secretary shall also establish a procedure for referring projects to the council for the designation of a consolidated permit agency in any of the following circumstances:

(1) Because of the nature of the project, the guidelines adopted pursuant to subdivision (a) do not provide clear guidance concerning which environmental agency should be designated the consolidated permit agency.

(2) The consolidated permit agency or a participating permit agency disagrees with the designation of the consolidated permit agency.

(3) The environmental agency designated as the consolidated permit agency under the guidelines declines the designation and participating permit agencies are not willing to accept designation as the consolidated permit agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 419, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

71021.

(a) A permit applicant for a project may request the secretary to designate a consolidated permit agency to administer the processing and issuance of a consolidated permit for the project pursuant to this division. The secretary, in accordance with the guidelines and procedures adopted pursuant to Section 71020, shall, within 30 days of the date that the request is received, either designate a consolidated permit agency for the project or refer the designation to the council.

(b) A permit applicant who requests the designation of a consolidated permit agency shall provide the secretary with a description of the project, a preliminary list of the environmental permits that the project may require, the identity of any public agency that has been designated the lead agency for the project pursuant to Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 65920) of Division 1 of Title 7 of the Government Code or Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code, and the identity of the participating permit agencies. The secretary may request any information from the permit applicant that is necessary to make the designation under subdivision (a), and may convene a scoping meeting of the likely consolidated permit agency and participating permit agencies in order to make that designation.

(c) The consolidated permit agency shall serve as the main point of contact for the permit applicant with regard to the processing of the consolidated permit for the project and shall manage the procedural aspects of that processing consistent with existing laws governing the consolidated permit agency and participating permit agencies, and with the procedures agreed to by those agencies in accordance with Section 71022. In carrying out these responsibilities, the consolidated permit agency shall ensure that the permit applicant has all the information needed to apply for all the component environmental permits that are incorporated in the consolidated permit for the project, coordinate the review of those environmental permits by the respective participating permit agencies, ensure that timely environmental permit decisions are made by the participating permit agencies, and assist in resolving any conflict or inconsistency among the environmental permit requirements and conditions that are to be imposed by the participating permit agencies with regard to the project.

(d) This division shall not be construed to limit or abridge the powers and duties granted to a participating permit agency pursuant to the law that authorizes or requires the agency to issue an environmental permit for a project. Each participating permit agency shall retain its authority to make all decisions on all nonprocedural matters with regard to the respective component environmental permit that is within its scope of its responsibility, including, but not limited to, the determination of environmental permit application completeness, environmental permit approval or approval with conditions, or environmental permit denial. The consolidated permit agency may not substitute its judgment for that of a participating permit agency on any such nonprocedural matters.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 419, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

71022.

(a) Within 15 working days of the date that the consolidated permit agency is designated, the consolidated permit agency shall convene a meeting with the permit applicant for the project and the participating permit agencies. The meeting agenda shall include at least all of the following matters:

(1) A determination of the environmental permits that are required for the project.

(2) A review of the environmental permit application forms and other application requirements of the agencies that are participating in the consolidated permit.

(3) A discussion of the option available to the permit applicant to use the consolidated permit application form that is authorized by subdivision (e) or (f) of Section 15399.56 of the Government Code in lieu of the separate application forms for each component environmental permit that would be provided by the consolidated permit agency and the participating permit agencies.

(4) A determination of the time lines that will be used by the consolidated permit agency and each participating permit agency to make environmental permit decisions, including the time periods required to determine if the environmental permit applications are complete or the consolidated permit application is complete, to review the application or applications, and to process the component environmental permits, and the timelines that will be used by the consolidated permit agency to aggregate the component environmental permits into, and to issue, the consolidated permit. Notwithstanding Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 15374) of Part 6.7 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 65920) of Division 1 of Title 7 of the Government Code, the timelines established pursuant to this paragraph may, with the assent of the consolidated permit agency and each participating permit agency, commit the consolidated permit agency and each participating permit agency to act on the component environmental permit within time periods that are different than those required by Sections 65950 and 65952 of the Government Code, subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 15376 of the Government Code, or other applicable provisions of law. However, no accelerated time period for the consideration of an environmental permit application may be set if that accelerated time period would be inconsistent with, or in conflict with, any time period or series of time periods set by statute for that consideration, or with any statute, rule, or regulation, or adopted state policy, standard, or guideline, which require any of the following:

(A) Other agencies, interested persons, or the public to be given adequate notice of the application.

(B) Other agencies to be given a role in, or be allowed to participate in, the decision to approve or disapprove the application.

(C) Interested persons or the public to be provided the opportunity to challenge, comment on, or otherwise voice their concerns regarding the application.

(5) The scheduling of any public hearings that are required to issue environmental permits for the project and a determination of the feasibility of coordinating or consolidating any of those required public hearings.

(6) A discussion of fee arrangements for the consolidated permit process, including an estimate of the fee required under Section 71026 and the billing schedule.

(b) The consolidated permit agency may request any information from the applicant that is necessary to comply with its obligations under this section, consistent with the timelines set pursuant to this section.

(c) A summary of the decisions made pursuant to this section shall be made available for public review upon the filing of the consolidated environmental permit application or environmental permit applications.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 419, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

71023.

(a) The permit applicant may withdraw from the consolidated permit process by submitting to the consolidated permit agency a written request that the process be terminated. Upon receipt of the request, the consolidated permit agency shall notify the secretary and each participating permit agency that a consolidated permit is no longer applicable to the project.

(b) The permit applicant may submit a written request to the consolidated permit agency that the permit applicant wishes a participating permit agency to withdraw from participation on the basis of a reasonable belief that the issuance of the consolidated permit would be accelerated if the participating permit agency withdraws. In that event, the participating permit agency shall withdraw from participation if the consolidated permit agency approves the request.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 419, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

71024.

The consolidated permit agency shall ensure that the participating permit agencies make all the environmental permit decisions that are necessary for the incorporation of the environmental permits into the consolidated permit and act on the component environmental permits within the time periods established pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 71022.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 419, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

71025.

Each environmental permit incorporated in the consolidated permit shall have the legal status and the regulatory effect that is specified in the statute and regulations under which the environmental permit would be separately issued and shall be administered and enforced by the environmental agency that would have separately issued it.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 419, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

71026.

(a) A consolidated permit agency may charge and collect a reasonable fee from any person seeking a consolidated permit to recover the estimated costs incurred by the consolidated permit agency in carrying out the requirements of this division.

(b) The fees charged shall recover only the costs of performing those consolidated permit services and shall be either negotiated with the permit applicant in the meeting required pursuant to Section 71022, or shall be set by the environmental agency in advance of its designation as a consolidated permit agency for the project in a fee schedule adopted by the environmental agency for use in the event that the environmental agency is so designated. In addition, the billing process shall provide for accurate time and cost accounting and a billing cycle that provides for progress payments.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 419, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

71027.

A petition by the permit applicant for review of an environmental agency action in issuing, denying, or amending an environmental permit, or any portion of a consolidated permit agency permit, shall be submitted by the permit applicant to the consolidated permit agency or the participating permit agency having jurisdiction over that portion of the consolidated permit and shall be processed in accordance with the procedures of that environmental agency. The environmental agency receiving the petition shall, within 30 days, notify the other environmental agencies participating in the original consolidated permit.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 419, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

71028.

If an applicant petitions for a significant amendment or modification to a consolidated permit application or any of its component environmental permit applications, the consolidated permit agency shall reconvene a meeting of the participating permit agencies, conducted in accordance with Section 71022.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 419, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

71029.

If an applicant fails to provide information required for the processing of the component environmental permit applications for a consolidated permit or for the designation of a consolidated permit agency, the time requirements of this division shall be tolled until such time as the information is provided.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 419, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Time Limit Appeals [71030. - 71031.]

71030.

(a) On or before December 31, 1994, the secretary shall adopt regulations establishing an expedited appeals process by which a petitioner or applicant may appeal any failure by an environmental agency to take timely action on the issuance or denial of an environmental permit in accordance with the time limits established pursuant to Section 71022 or Section 25199.6 of the Health and Safety Code.
